District of Columbia statutes.
2-217.07

Repealed

Applicability date.

Repealed.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-268, § 10, 46 DCR 969
Oct 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(b), 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90-day) addition of subchapter II-B [1981 Ed.], see notes following § 2-217.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-1153.7.